pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Wspinaczka > Taśmy wspinaczkowe: Regulowane pasy wspinaczkowe; Zawiesia wspinaczkowe
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Penjanje > Mreža za penjanje: Lanci za penjanje; Remenje za penjanje
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Klatring > Nylonsnore til klatring: Kæder til klatring; Klatreslynger
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 등반 > 등반 웨빙: 등반용 데이지 체인; 등반용 슬링
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Kiipeily > Nauhalenkit: Kiipeilyn nauhalenkit; Kiipeilyn slingit
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Klettern > Gurtbänder: Daisy Chains; Kletterschlingen
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ปีนเขา > สายรัดปีนเขา: สายเกี่ยวแขวนสำหรับปีนเขา; สลิงปีนเขา
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > クライミング > 登山用ウェビング: 登山用デイジーチェーン; 登山用スリング
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lezectví > Lezecké popruhy: Smyčka daisy chain na lezení; Lezecké smyčky
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Αναρρίχηση > Ιμάντες αναρρίχησης: Αλυσίδες αναρρίχησης; Σφεντόνες αναρρίχησης
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Alpinismo > Cintos para alpinismo: Correntes de margaridas para escalada; Cintas de escalada
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Klatring > Klatrenett: Daisy Chains for klatring; Klatreslynger
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 攀岩用品 > 攀岩扁带: 攀岩菊花链; 攀岩吊索
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Laipiojimas > Laipiojimo juostos: „Daisy Chain“ tipo kilpos; Savisaugos kilpos
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 攀爬運動 > 攀岩吊繩: 攀岩環式繩鍊; 攀岩吊帶
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Escalade > Sangles d'escalade: Daisy chains d’escalade; Sangle d'escalade
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Klättring > Klättringswebbing: Daisy chains för klättring; Klätterslingor
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Катерене > Ленти за катерене: Верига за катерене тип „маргаритка“; Примки от тръбна лента
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Mászás > Hegymászó hálózás: Hegymászó fűzőlétrák; Hegymászó kapcsok
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Escalada > Cintas para escalada: Correias daisy para escalada; Faixas de escalada
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Arrampicata > Fettuccia da arrampicata: Catene a margherita da arrampicata; Imbracature da arrampicata
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plezanje > Plezalni trakovi: Jeklene vrvi; Plezalne zanke
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Скалолазание > Альпинистские стропы: Дейзи-чейн; Петли
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Klimmen > Spanbanden voor klimmen: Daisy-kettingen voor klimmen; Gordels voor klimmen
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Horolezectvo > Horolezecké popruhy: Horolezecké slučkové laná; Lezecké závesy
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Escalada > Cinta tubular: Cadenas de escalada; Eslingas de escalada
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Tırmanış > Tırmanma Kayışları: Tırmanma Papatya Zincirleri; Tırmanma Sapanları
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Leo núi > Dây đai leo núi: Dây chuỗi xích leo núi; Cáp leo núi
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Alpinism > Plase pentru alpinism: Lanțuri „daisy chain” pentru alpinism; Chingi pentru alpinism
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Climbing > Climbing Webbing: Climbing Daisy Chains; Climbing Slings